Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1214.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 205(b) of the act of May 22, 1933 (P.L.853, No.155), known as The General County Assessment Law, is amended to read:Section 205. Temporary Tax Exemption for Residential Construction.--* * *(b) New single and multiple dwellings constructed for residential purposes and improvements to existing unoccupied dwellings or improvements to existing structures for purposes of conversion to dwellings, shall not be valued or assessed for 1234567891011121314151617181920212223 purposes of real property taxes until (1) occupied, (2) conveyed to a bona fide purchaser or, (3) thirty months or commencement of improvement, whichever is later, from the first day of the month after which the building permit was issued or[, if no building permit or other notification of improvement was required, then from] the date construction commenced. The assessment of any multiple dwelling because of occupancy shall be upon such proportion which the value of the occupied portion bears to the value of the entire multiple dwelling.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1214PN1362 - 2 - 12345678910